"She has a lot of information in her head about the acquiring company and there may be information there that may be useful to Supermarkets General in their defense.I think she's walking a very thin line." 
One reason Optima could reshape the credit-card business is that American Express is the first high-profile card issuer with national marketing muscle to introduce a low-rate card.Beyond that, its foray into revolving credit -- in which the card holder must make only a minimal payment each month -- further blurs the once-well-defined line between banks and other financial-service companies. 
The Pentagon has strenuously resisted moves to upgrade the status of the units that deal with "low intensity conflict."Members of the Joint Chiefs argued that Congress was trying to create a "fifth service" that would cut across traditional lines of military authority. 
A Japanese Embassy spokesman in Washington said: "The supercomputer issue is a matter between two governments.This (the Fujitsu proposal) is a matter between two companies, and a line should be drawn between the two." 
Adds Ray Ablondi, a marketing research director at Ford Motor Co.: "We don't recognize something called a middle class.We work across demographic, psycho-graphic and life-style lines. 
In the past, people's shopping decisions were restricted partly by their limited familiarity with what was available.But mass communication has since spread tastes and wants across social and economic lines. 
But she refuses to buy imported New Zealand strawberries at $5 or $6 a box."That's where I draw the line," she says. 
Today, it is more vital than ever.In 1983, the act was entrenched in the new constitution, which established a tricameral parliament along racial lines, with separate chambers for whites, coloreds and Asians but none for blacks. 
But otherwise, he says, "I'm not sure we should regulate" many off-exchange transactions.Exchanges say the line should be firm. 
In some regards, he was almost a cliche: an ambitious young man who rose too far too fast and wound up in the worst sort of trouble.He says he crossed the line into criminality without even realizing it. 
But in France, which has long considered television a public service and a cultural force, discovering that it's also a business has come as a jolt.And although many business executives laud the recent rehabilitation of free enterprise and profit, many Frenchmen clearly draw the line at television. 
Guthrie Birkhead, dean of Syracuse University's Maxwell School of Citizenship and Public Affairs, notes that in recent years, businesses have "raided" his school and recruited around 10% of each graduating class."But it's not that disturbing," he says, "because the line between the public and private sectors is blurring. 
We think you can be serving the public good at the Moody's or the Goldman Sachses too."A blurry line doesn't help the schools, which from the beginning have struggled to separate themselves from the more established law schools and business schools. 
But analysts say many banks might be forced to deal with such reductions in equity by selling assets and issuing stock to buttress their shareholders equity.Mr. Levi thinks a sharper line will be drawn in the future between well-capitalized banks that can "gracefully" buttress reserves and those "who will be really hurt." 
On balance, says Mr. Schoenwald, "I feel that it's a good company worth holding."The difficulty of drawing a line can be seen in other funds. 
"But currency exchange rates can't be neglected, and now they have to be given new emphasis."Mr. Poehl is walking a fine line. 
Bernarda Alba is a single-minded matriarch who embodies the combined authority of the church, the family and society.She is tyrannical enough without underscoring her cruelty, which is what Ms. Jackson does, barking out commands in a hard-edged, loud voice that carries the play over the line from tragedy to melodrama. 
"Are we going to have people drinking Crisco?" asks Joseph Kozloff, an analyst for PaineWebber Inc.Fat substitutes, meanwhile, further blur the line between food and medicine, adding to a development that researchers call "medical foods." 
An industry safety committee was formed, and contracts of actors and directors have been changed to include safety provisions."The incident will serve to temper the zeal of film makers (when they) walk that fine line between the art of illusion and creating reality," says Terry Young, director of risk management at MGM/UA Entertainment Co. 
Only two things have to "go wrong at the same time and there are going to be problems" at a bank, he added.Some bankers concede a compromise on capital adequacy requirements will have to be worked out as securities regulators decide where to draw the line between banking and securities businesses. 
On one end is the Monday night poker game; on the other end is the large public service group.We don't know where the Supreme Court will draw the line." 
Those who are opposed to rape are induced to become naturally hostile toward sex, and those who like sex are inclined to become a bit more kindly disposed toward rape.The entire case against coercive sex rests on denying Ms. Dworkin's equation, and insisting on the line of demarcation between voluntary and involuntary intercourse. 
The Federal Reserve Board's decision to give three major bank holding companies limited authority to deal in securities through subsidiaries further blurs the legal line separating commercial and investment banking. 
The Fed's decision to give three big banks limited authority to deal in securities through subsidiaries further blurs the legal line between commercial and investment banking. 
"The firm has not given us formal notice, but we have it on sufficiently reliable sources that they are doing this," said Jay Biggins, executive director of the city's Office for Economic Development.Mr. Biggins said the city went as far as it could to inspire Penney to stay but added, "The city draws a line beyond which it can't go, in order to remain fair to other companies." 
CBOE and Philadelphia exchange officials couldn't be reached.Leo Melamed, special counsel to the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, which is expected to reap increased stock-index and foreign currency futures business from the Japanese, said, "It appears they're drawing the line between retail and institutional business." 
An announcement is expected today.The new powers for Bankers Trust New York Corp., Citicorp and J.P. Morgan & Co. further blur the legal line separating commercial and investment banking. 
The SEC's revived activism in the banking realm doesn't sit well with the American Bankers Association, either.In light of the blurred line between the banking and securities industries, the SEC required all commercial banks that solicit brokerage business to register as broker-dealers. 
Before then, he says, he would smoke in front of his boss, a former smoker, in "real social" situations.But he drew the line when it came to work or travel. 
Thus, some families are probably buying take-out food from grocery stores -- such as barbecued chicken -- but aren't classifying it as such.The line between groceries and take-out food may have become blurred. 
In a letter to workers before a scheduled vote in February on joining the union, the president of Bell Atlantic's Bell Atlanticom said: "We do not want this union in our company!The union can cause plenty of trouble . . . ." A month later, the union's president, Morton Bahr, told Bell Atlantic's chairman, Thomas E. Bolger, "The management activity has crossed the lines of decency, and that is being charitable." 
Mr. Allen, who is black, is considered a conservative.Designed as an independent, fact-finding agency, the commission has been sharply divided along ideological lines in recent years. 
"For the legal profession, the breakup of AT&T has been like receiving an unsolicited annuity," says Kenneth Robinson, a Commerce Department telecommunications official.Says David Sather, counsel for U S West Inc., a regional phone company: "I don't mind putting their (lawyers') kids through school, but I draw the line at their grandchildren." 
Republican Donald Haider also ran.Mr. Washington won the Democratic Party primary in February in a vote that was divided largely along racial lines and, in the general election, faced three white opponents. 
If inside people are not competitive, how can your organization be competitive in the marketplace?Consultants who work across industry lines will confirm that the fundamentals in every industry are almost identical. 
Although Mr. Jefferies wasn't an underwriter of the Fireman's Fund issue, his case highlights an area that affects a wide range of large and small investors.It is an area where the line between legality and illegality is unusually thin. 
Many diploma-mill customers know exactly what they are getting, but Diane Ravitch, a professor of history and education at Teachers College at Columbia University, believes that others may not.As the number of night schools and correspondence classes has risen, she says, the line between real and bogus schools has become "blurrier." 
Amid all her parenting responsibilities, she couldn't fit in 40 hours of work a week."I couldn't draw a definite line -- I'd drop everything for my children," recalls Mrs. Schuldt, who has returned to work at the factory, part-time. 
After signing a multibillion-dollar borrowing, Mexican Finance Minister Gustavo Petricioli has to tread a careful line between the angry rhetoric of disgruntled major debtors like Brazil and the calm words his foreign lenders now expect from Mexico. 
And, of course, that's true.In a Marxist society geared up for war, there are no clear lines separating officials, soldiers and civilians. 
Although they are impressively energetic, one somehow feels that their painterly virtuosity runs away with them a bit.Perhaps this is because the way they try to bridge the line between abstraction and figuration doesn't seem to be quite resolved. 
"On the whole, I would as soon not have done it."Some draw the line at far more mundane requests. 
An agent called "Jack" had forced a Palestinian to call himself a poodle, crawl on all fours and bark, an investigation found, while the other agent had slapped an arrested Arab journalist and bound his hands to a pipe "a number of times," though never for more than an hour.Because the Shin Bet's secrecy extends even to its code of behavior and disciplinary record, it is unclear where the agency draws the line. 
U.S. diplomats have backed off from the controversy, and that disappoints U.S. farmers."If we could get the Japanese to cross that white line," says J. Stephen Gabbert, executive vice president of the Rice Millers Association, "it might restructure the political system and break a psychological barrier to imported goods." 
"We do promote positivism," Mr. Decherd said in a speech last year.The policy sometimes means the News walks a fine line on objectivity. 
It does deprive the AWSJ of 4,600 copies' worth of sales and advertising, as it is intended to do.The editorial stated that the AWSJ "has already published a series of letters from officials," but "self-respecting editors must somewhere draw a line." 
"For all the talk about gray areas, my clients can sense what's all right and what isn't," he says."They don't call me and say: 'Where's the line, so I can stay just barely on the safe side of it.'" 
But the PacMan defense, to be effective, needed some market momentum to get Bendix into play, pushing up its stock price so it would realize the market was taking the Martin Marietta attack seriously.So just before Martin Marietta's bid was unveiled, Mr. Siegel called Mr. Boesky and leaked the top secret plan, fully aware that he had just crossed the line of illegality. 
The lawyers say they hold out hope of treatment and legal redress to thousands of workers whose asbestos exposure has long been ignored by employers, government agencies and unions.But as the attorneys cross the line between law and medicine, their tactics are generating controversy as well as lawsuits. 
Even Treasury Secretary James Baker has admitted publicly that items such as the Medicare proposal come under the rubric of tax increases.Pressed, Mr. Miller concedes that the line between taxes and user charges is a bit fuzzy. 
The paper has already published a series of letters from officials, but in the end editors bear some responsibility for the accuracy and fairness of even letters to the editor.Singapore officials seem to be using their new press law to claim unlimited access for whatever they choose to allege, and self-respecting editors must somewhere draw a line. 
But it's clear that tensions between Washington and Citicorp are growing rapidly."There's a fine line between being tough and being a spoiler," one U.S. official said. 
President Reagan's biographer, Edmund Morris, may be about to cross the line between writing history and making it. 
Meanwhile, corporations are paring legal budgets and forcing outside law firms to bid competitively for their business.Law firms walk a fine line in devising marketing that brings in new business without offending conservative partners or old-line clients who value discretion. 
One solution being considered is a big across-the-board reduction in the services that the health-insurance funds pay for.Others divide along political lines. 
By racing and pounding the first movement of the Sonata No. 32 (marked Maestoso-Allegro con brio ed appassionato) he produced not heroism, but a tantrum.Mr. Barenboim's performances also raise the question: When does true interpretation cross the line into mere caprice? 
"How far can the administration reach when it observes conduct troublesome to everyone, but which did not interfere with the educational process?Where do you draw the line?" 
MAGAZINES ARE IN for more rivalry from mail-order catalogs as the line between them blurs. 
Bent on returning its struggling steel unit to profitability, USX demanded steep wage and benefit cuts and, more important, the right to assign jobs and reorganize work crews without union interference -- the same issue that prompted an industrywide strike in 1959.Long embittered by the company's diversification into oil, the union drew a line against further sacrifice. 
He was such a key figure at the bank," says David Poutney, a bank analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd, a securities unit of Barclays Bank PLC.Mr. Seelig, referred to as "Roger the artful dodger" by rivals during his 15 years at Morgan Grenfell, "perfectly straddled the fine line between being fainthearted and cutting too many corners," says a corporate finance director at a rival merchant bank. 
The line between tacky and urbane is called Broadway here, and it runs right through the middle of town. 
"We have made every effort possible to improve distribution."Yet the Matsushita-GE impasse indicates that some Japanese manufacturers may now have decided to draw the line. 
He was not fully in control until October, when he flew back from an IMF meeting in Belgrade to institute tight money.August 1979 stands as a bright line separating the era of inflation from the era of disinflation. 
"Every year we go to the toy fair, and we come back saying, 'It's not getting any better.'"For example, although Hasbro, the biggest toy maker, also markets board games and other "gender-neutral" items, it organizes its biggest sellers strictly along sex-role lines. 
Kids ages four to nine are "fashion-conscious" as well as gender-conscious, she says.Among the exceptions to the gender line are construction products like Lego System Inc.'s Lego or Habermaas' T.C. Timber, which has a package showing a girl in a frilly dress surveying a toy construction site. 
"We don't mind raising fees if there is value added, but I don't see it in the new audit proposals."Mr. Sullivan recognizes that the board "must tread a fine line between the urgings of Congress and the concerns of business." 
"To even comment on this is risky for a presidential candidate," says David Keene, an adviser to Mr. Dole."You have to walk a fine line. 
It was being distributed by the Conservative Caucus, which for several years has been campaigning to force Chevron to pull out of its partnership with Sociedade Nacional de Combustiveis de Angola (Sonangol), a state oil company under the control of Angola's Marxist MPLA government.The campaign has cut across ideological and political lines. 
Its greatness is that it laid the foundation for a system in which future generations could carry out their own reforms and solve their own problems.Today, watching South Korea struggle to establish the most minimal republican institutions -- or watching France limp along with two men in charge because nobody ever drew the line between the executive and legislative branches -- we can only marvel at our forefathers' accomplishments. 
State attempts to shield their corporations from hostile bids have "presented serious impediments to the free and efficient operation" of the stock markets, Mr. Ruder said."Drawing the line between appropriate state regulation of internal corporate affairs and improper state regulation of national tender offers is not easy," he added, "but the task is unavoidable." 
Generally it tells more about the speaker than about the topic under discussion.Yet to draw the line, as Mr. Carter does, between speech acceptable to men as a class as against women as a class conveys a sexist attitude more objectionable, perhaps, than being foulmouthed. 
But humanitarian assistance, traditionally the domain of civilians, is geared more toward providing food, clothing or medical services to individuals.In Vietnam, the lines between the military and civilian agencies became blurred, with intelligence operators, for example, often using positions in the Agency for International Development, or AID, as "cover." 
But the most effective check on desktop computer gurus, experts say, is a computer-literate manager.Such bosses can recognize the often murky distinction between productivity and play on a computer, and can draw the line clearly so their workers won't get led astray. 
Barely one in 11 would absolutely refuse.The students, though, do draw the line. 
April marked the first month when overall industry assets declined since December 1983.BB&K's Mr. Biehl concedes that the line dividing Diversa Fund clients and the newsletter subscribers is already fuzzy. 
But Robert Giordano, an economist at Goldman, Sachs & Co., expressed concern that political considerations might lead Mr. Greenspan, a Republican, to tolerate a slight pickup in inflation for the sake of better economic growth."Volcker drew a line at 4% inflation," Mr. Giordano asserted. 
NATO made a virtue out of a necessity.The sudden outbreak of the Six-Day War in the Near East raised the stakes by reminding the world of the thin line between peace and war. 
Ms. Thernstrom questions the wisdom of such results: "Are minorities sometimes better off with fewer seats but more diffused influence -- a smaller number of blacks in office, but a greater number of representatives who owe their election to black constituents?"The reshaping of a substantial number of political districts along racial lines has gone virtually unnoticed by Congress and the media. 
"The Sandinistas interpreted this as an unwillingness of the Soviets to assume" responsibility to protect the regime, he says.Indeed, the Soviets have carefully avoided crossing other lines drawn by the U.S. administration. 
In Czechoslovakia, more than in any other country of the Soviet sphere, the leadership has had a difficult time.It is struggling to walk a credible line between the retrenchment it was brought in to enforce two decades ago and Mr. Gorbachev's drive to revive socialism with doses of the free market and freedom of thought. 
At the hearing yesterday, Judge Kennedy said, "It seems to me that most Americans, most lawyers, most judges believe liberty includes protection of a value we know as privacy.""There is a zone of liberty," he added, ". . . where a line is drawn where the individual can tell the government, 'Beyond this line, you may not go.'The great question is where to draw that line." 
Judge Anthony Kennedy concluded his testimony for his Supreme Court nomination, walking a fine line between liberal and conservative senators concerned about where his legal views fit on the political spectrum. 
And, at a time of shrinking medical income, the exploitation of medical fashions offers a rich opportunity for financial gain.The lines are drawn. 
But the New Democratic Party itself placed second in a Gallup poll, being favored by 34% of decided voters, compared with 35% for the Liberals and 29% for the Conservatives.So Mr. Broadbent walks a fine line. 
Mr. Roh nevertheless scheduled his Seoul rally to coincide with the anniversary.His advisers say his speech will draw the clearest line yet between himself and the highly unpopular President Chun. 
"The Fed is caught between deflationary signals and inflationary signals coexisting at the same time.They've got to walk a very fine line." 
The new rules, which were put into effect two weeks ago without any public announcement, are supposed to clarify what that license allows.Investment advisers said the regulations will force them to continue treading a fine line between offering advice and actually selling securities. 
And when it is ready, we will deploy it."If all of this seems like a delicate line to walk, well, apparently sometimes even the president slips. 
"With Congress not having done anything meaningful on the budget deficit, the process of controlling the economy falls on the shoulders of the Fed," Mr. Kahan said."The Fed is going to have to walk a thin line between being too tight and causing us to fall directly into recession, and being overly stimulative and therefore leading to an inflationary bout." 
He appealed to the Tax Court.Now Special Judge Dinan has drawn a line that may surprise some tax experts: Hendrickson was inexperienced and owned minority shares in only three wells, so he was unable to play an active role in management and operations or to influence operational decisions. 
Such foggy rhetoric reflects a 30-year-long weakening of the Democratic and Republican parties.They have fewer and fewer strong adherents divided by clear lines of traditional left-right ideology. 
And carriers may have to mention that return portions of most non-refundable tickets can't be used when travelers miss departing flights."We're essentially drawing a specific line and saying, 'Step across it and we'll sue you,'" says one task-force member. 
Back home, he has plenty of his own problems, from a surly bureaucracy to Sikh terrorists to restless Gurkhas to troubled borders with Pakistan and China.He walks a fine line in dealing with the separatist movement in India's own Tamil state. 
The move would have been organized by management and carried out by workers with job classifications allowing them to haul equipment.But now, the skilled-trades workers were not only organizing the move but also were willing to cross job lines and help. 
They debate ethics in the easy, wisecracking language of Daniel Petrie Jr.'s deft script while they drive to a Cajun restaurant in Remy's convertible.He gets her drunk, and they eat and dance and continue wrangling about where to put the fine line between perks and graft. 
And the ramifications will go far beyond international economics.There is a fine line between trade and politics in the Persian Gulf nations. 
The best way to experience the "Sculpture Project" is with a good pair of walking shoes, plenty of time, and a copy of the moderately priced, bilingual guide sold by the Westphalian Landesmuseum (conveniently situated just across from the cathedral, where the treasure hunt starts).In Munster, too, the line between art and non-art is often less than clear. 
The words "Democratic" and "Liberal" have become synonymous -- the health of liberalism is now measured by the success of the Democratic Party in the latest presidential election.The line between policy analyst and political tactician has become similarly blurred. 
The Fed's founding fathers had just that kind of structure in mind almost 75 years ago.The lines are blurring; the priorities changing. 
"The Flood" skillfully combines hypermodern graphics and computer projections, live actors and 3-D animation.Yet all of the "Alive" shows tread the fine line between experimentation and excess. 
Notes of White House meetings indicate President Reagan shared Adm. Poindexter's penchant for turning words.The naval officer testified that even Col. North had difficulty "drawing the fine line that the president was drawing" in defending a plan that encompassed selling weapons to a nation that had supported terrorists holding American hostages in Lebanon. 
But it wasn't clear whether this would force a tightening of controls.The court stopped short of saying where the agency should draw the line on safety. 
For this reason, Mr. Smith makes sure the paper-product managers and workers don't feel inferior to their counterparts at the more glamorous marketing divisions."It's a fine, fine line you've got to walk," says Mr. Smith, a down-to-earth executive who tours plants in blue jeans and running shoes. 
Obviously, the lack of turnover in House seats benefits incumbents of both parties.But just as obviously, it entrenches the ideological balance that prevailed when the lines were drawn and the incumbent-protection legislation was passed. 
His approach was at times very broad -- saying there was only a "semantic" difference between military and non-lethal "humanitarian" aid for the Contras -- and at times very narrow -- arguing a distinction between "covert actions" and clandestine "special activities."In a telling exchange, Adm. Poindexter acknowledged that even Col. North had difficulty "drawing the fine line that the president was drawing" in defending the early Iran initiative and the plan to sell weapons to a nation that supported terrorists. 
Even some state regulators say the rules can go too far."It's a fine line between consumer protection and overprotection," says Ann Marie Brady, Wisconsin's deputy securities commissioner. 
Government and private analysts alike don't think the Iranians are likely to mount a frontal attack, because that would invite large-scale retaliation."They'll have to draw a line between not wanting to spread the war and doing something," says Ruhollah Ramazani, an Iranian-born scholar at the University of Virginia. 
Still, sex and violence outsell economics.Takao Saito, who draws the 18-year-old "Golgo 13" series, notices a change: "Until recently, there was a line between manga that had sex and those that didn't.That line has been blurred." 
These days, Beijing emphasizes the cooperation in an effort to woo Taiwan, to which the Kuomintang fled after being defeated by the Communists.Chinese leaders, meanwhile, have sought to draw the line on harsh anti-Japanese rhetoric. 
Any concentration of power is oppressive; the concentration of economic power is frightening.Let us hope that Congress will have the guts or the wisdom to draw a line against the unbridled economic concentration that is implied in the Treasury's no-longer-secret plan. 
"There are all kinds of guidelines this violates," says retired Col. John Miller, editor of the Naval Institute's Proceedings magazine."The line was crossed sometime before. 
So far, his energy and aggressive stance have surprised critics and earned favorable reviews at home.Virginia's voters are much on Sen. Trible's mind; up for reelection next year, he is walking a line between loyalty to the president and the new independence he needs to survive. 
But the accounting profession should still be careful of where its management-consulting business is headed.When it moves over the line of giving advice to making the actual business deals and directing business strategy for audit clients, it may encounter the ire of congressional watchdogs. 
The reappointment of the 57-year-old Bundesbank chief was widely expected, despite some criticism of his expansive monetary policies at home.The Bundesbank has been walking a narrow line between international demands for more West German economic growth and domestic fears of rekindling inflation. 
Justice William Brennan, joined by Justices Thurgood Marshall, Sandra O'Connor and Harry Blackmun, said the question of whether religious groups could hire only members of their own faith remains open when church-run, for-profit businesses are involved.They warned that Justice White's decision didn't draw a sharp enough line between nonprofit and for-profit activities. 
Perhaps the most blatant sign that the insurgency has become the opiate of the clergy is that on the regional cease-fire committees during peace talks earlier this year five of the 20 National Democratic Front's slots were filled by priests.For their part the Marxists have worked hard to fudge the line between out-and-out communists and well-intentioned democratic social activists in United Front fashion a la Nicaragua, another poor Catholic country that threw off a corrupt dictatorship. 
The Supreme Court left intact a federal appeals court ruling that Bankers Trust Co. may sell commercial paper for its clients.The high court's refusal to hear an appeal by the Securities Industry Association is a boost for the Federal Reserve Board's policy of allowing the legal line between commercial banking and securities to blur. 
Politicians in the nation's third-largest city began maneuvering within hours after Mr. Washington died from a heart attack Wednesday.Neighborhood factions, often split along racial lines, are jockeying behind the scenes, and some are calling for a special election. 
Frances Hodgson Burnett left England as a child in the 1850s, and started writing sentimental tales about her homeland while living in a Kentucky log cabin -- which may account for their idealized sweetness.Unfortunately, despite its excellent cast, this Hallmark Hall of Fame presentation crosses the fine line that divides the sweet from the saccharine. 
The Fed can push down market interest rates through its so-called open market operations, by buying securities from banks and thus adding money to the banking system.At the moment, the central bank seems to be walking a narrow line, using "open market" operations to keep rates down, but holding the discount rate stable in an attempt to keep the exchange markets calm. 
Citing numerous precedents, Pennzoil says Texaco must prove that Pennzoil intended to defraud public shareholders through its early-purchase arrangement with the museum -- proof, it says, that doesn't exist.Citing equally numerous precedents, Texaco and the SEC say 10b-13 is a "bright line" rule with no room for interpretation -- that by arranging to purchase shares privately with its tender offer outstanding Pennzoil walked over the line of legality. 
He got the job.Now Mr. Murphy treads a thin line between the hackers he reveres and the corporate clients he reviles.The line is so thin that critics doubt that his reformation is real. 
No one can seriously claim to have been deluded about the politics of federal spending the past seven years.In drawing the line on taxes, the President made clear his intention to stop the great game of the 1960s and 1970s of turning over to the government ever more of the private economy's resources. 
Because of the ambiguity, he says if brokers are asked directly, "the safer course . . . is to disclose.I wish we could give more specific advice to our members as to where the line should be drawn. 
Rep. John Murtha (D., Pa.), invoking the blessing of Energy and Commerce Committee Chairman John Dingell (D., Mich.), sought to extend this year's deadline until 1989, but backed down after being assured of an opportunity to offer the same amendment on the floor."There is a fine line between fixing the Clean Air Act and gutting the act," said Rep. Edward Boland (D., Mass.), whose subcommittee oversees the Environmental Protection Agency and who expects the issue to return before the House. 
Various vampires and zombies accosted my wife and me.The park draws the line at spooking in restrooms as well as using devil worship and "excessive acts of violence" as themes, Mr. Zanville says. 
Vast riches can result from schmoozing on the telephone, over lunch, at the club, over drinks, or, as in Levine's case, during discreet walks.When competition is intense and timing is everything, the line between legitimate sharing of gossip and illegal sharing of inside information can blur. 
Desk traders said selling by several fund groups contributed to the market's decline.Many fund managers -- including those with high cash reserves -- are walking a thin line. 
"We have these twin fears that inflation is going out of control or that we are heading into recession," Mr. Jordan says.To allay those fears, Mr. Greenspan must walk a very narrow line, he adds. 
No doubt there are those with pathological coping mechanisms resulting in exercise abuse.However, there often is a fine line between the abusers and those individuals striving to enhance the quality of their lives through exercise. 
"Why should Guinness shareholders finish up carrying the costs, when it's the Distillers shareholders who will benefit" from the acquisition?Mr. Seelig "perfectly straddled the fine line between being fainthearted and cutting too many corners," a corporate-finance director at a rival merchant bank said earlier this year. 
We are made anxious by the juxtaposition of substance with froth -- and for a good reason.Public TV is one of those twilight zones in which the lines between "high" and "low" culture are at their blurriest. 
One woman engineer was asked to open her case for inspection; it turned up only birth-control pills and other personal medications, according to the Burlington spokesman.Critics say there's a fine line between the corporate right to a drug-free workplace and the employee's right to privacy -- and dignity. 
Thompson claimed it was all tax-free as damages for personal injury.Now Judge Scott has drawn the line: The back-pay award is taxable as wages "owing" to Thompson that her employer "withheld" in a breach of contract. 
How do we, in a free society, define a government that has crossed the line between the permissible and the impermissible? 
He said some Burger King people were transferred to other positions, while some employees who weren't involved in the account were let go.One employee described the mood in New York as "demoralized," and said the situation was exacerbated because the layoffs "cut across department lines." 
Let virtue be its own reward."He draws the line, however, at altruism aimed at the welfare of subhuman species: "The human heart is distended until it is as big as all outdoors." 
And Ms. Gordon, the Miami stockbroker, found a doctor who would prescribe anti-inflammatory drugs to keep down the pains in her ankles and knees so nothing would stop her exercise routine.Some doctors and sports professionals maintain that the line between healthy and obsessive exercise is too fine to separate addicts from average exercisers. 
He prefers not to think about where the goods are headed; "I'm in the sales business," he says, "not delivery."Local U.S. customs officials try to walk a fine line between cooperating with the Mexican counterparts and jeopardizing the rights of the smugglers. 
"We haven't figured out yet how to handicap the games, or how to handle the situation," says John Fitzgerald, president of the Hilton hotel-casino."If some people cross the line and make a particular team look strong . . . that'll make a big difference." 
It hasn't.There's a real delicate line there, and it's hard for people to understand how we do it." 
That the teaching occupation needs high professional standards is indisputable -- and the board created for that purpose should get on with the task.For its part, Congress should think twice before erasing yet another line of demarcation between public and private. 
It's simply that the company believes reader loyalty is dwindling as the other magazines make themselves too hospitable to advertisers."You draw a line, and the seven sisters will cross it," Mr. Selbert contends. 
That points out a peculiarity in black America.Unlike most Americans, blacks do not yet vote along class lines. 
Edward Regan, the Republican comptroller, said "it's normal that the legislature adds {to spending}.It's up to the executive to draw the line. 
"This assures a horse race," said one person familiar with the committee's thinking.But the Forstmann-led group must walk a fine line with the directors. 
Mr. Bush, the scion of an upperclass Eastern family, chose the more polished Navy.Judging from Mr. Hynes's descriptions, those are the class lines along which that choice usually was made: "Of my flight school friends, it was certainly true that the well-bred ones tended to take Navy commissions; and those like myself who felt provincial, or common, or underbred, chose the Marine Corps, where those qualities wouldn't show." 
This is the real scandal of racial politics, circa 1988.Our own view is that the politics of race has become too polarized along party, and philosophical, lines. 
We should enlarge the franchise, not change it."Mr. Jackson called The Wall Street Journal to complain about a front-page story last week that quoted a number of moderate or conservative Democrats charging Mr. Jackson with threatening to split the party along racial and class lines, especially if Michael Dukakis loses the election to George Bush next Tuesday. 
"Honoraria can only be accepted under the fiction that it's payment for services rendered," says Stanley Brand, former counsel to the House of Representatives.When used as a lobbying tool, he says, "a prosecutor may decide that it's gone over the line from a payment to a gift or gratuity or bribe." 
At a news conference in Boston, Mr. Syron gave few clues to his thinking on monetary policy, but he said the Fed's role is "made much more complicated" by the budget and trade deficits.The Fed "has had to walk a very, very fine line for some time," he said."One naturally worries about how long you can go on walking a fine line." 
The sheer mass of the black majority -- 26 million, to 5 million whites -- has trampled color barriers in the larger cities.Urbanization has obscured tribal lines. 
At various moments Alla might recall Edith Piaf, Tina Turner or Vicki Carr singing "It Must Be Him" while softly crying.Alla belongs to an international tradition of emotionally naked chanteuses who walk the line between sophistication and schmaltz while acting each song as if it were a playlet. 
A few years ago, the idea that there might be anything unconstitutional about punitive damages occupied scarcely any space in law review articles.But now the U.S. Supreme Court is being peppered with appeals urging the nine justices to draw the line on such damages. 
"They want us to go along with them on the Bush effort, in a public way.You admire people's zeal, but you have to draw the line," says Sister Joy Kronenberger, C.D.P., who operates an active pro-life education, poster and prayer program for the diocese. 
PC Magazine is one of about a half-dozen computer publications that offer such electronic companions, and more are on the way.These services are blurring the lines between print and electronic publishing. 
It properly involves a variety of message carriers -- including the Voice of America, Worldnet television and skilled, language-qualified foreign-service officers among others -- to reach important and diverse audiences overseas.These audiences themselves have interests that defy easy categorization along informational or cultural lines. 
The failure of Judith Richards Hope to win confirmation to the prestigious appeals court here means the Reagan administration has come up short in its effort to completely transform what many lawyers and legal scholars consider the second most important court next to the U.S. Supreme Court.The U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit is split along partisan lines, with Reagan nominees enjoying a slim, 6-5 majority. 
Consumer and small-business banking is overseen by Mr. Middlemas, the president, while big corporate customers are overseen by James W. Thompson, chairman of the Southeast Bank.The Southeast Bank also focuses NCNB on customer-group lines, rather than according to geography. 
Although it seemed evident that Sen. Bentsen gave the far more polished performance last night, Republicans were hopeful that expectations were so low for Sen. Quayle -- who has been constantly criticized and even ridiculed since his selection -- that merely staying on his feet for 90 minutes and not making any embarrassing slip-ups will remove him as a liability for the GOP ticket.The post-debate analysis fell along predictable partisan lines, with each side saying that its man did better. 
He might have pointed out that multicultural grants tend to go to second-generation Australians trying to rediscover their roots rather than to newly arrived immigrants.Or he might have pointed out that any discrimination along racial lines is anti-Western, exactly the sort of thing most immigrants have come to Australia to escape. 
But he didn't.So today in Australia there are some people arguing the right thing for the wrong reasons and others arguing the wrong thing for the right reasons, cutting across all political lines. 
Certilman Haft Balin Buckley Kremer & Hyman, a midsized New York law firm, is splitting along geographic and practice lines, effective Oct. 1. 
What bothers police about such actions, says Jerald Vaughn, executive director of the International Association of Chiefs of Police, is that they represent "a breakdown of the rule of law."He maintains, "It's only a matter of time before these groups step over the line. " They may begin rousting others they dislike -- people "who are not the right skin color or the right religious persuasion," he says. 
Syria expressed support for a rival government declared Friday by its Moslem allies after Gemayel's six-year term expired.The dispute threatened to formally partition Lebanon along sectarian lines and rekindle the 13-year civil war. 
As we develop more sophisticated and expensive medications, AZT will be remembered as a bargain.Where do we draw the line? 
And even under the best of circumstances, U.S. officials say, it is unlikely that all nine American hostages will be liberated.The Reagan administration is trying to walk a fine line between making concessions to terrorists and missing what some officials think is the most promising opportunity yet to secure the hostages' freedom. 
A soaring dollar would wipe out the competitive edge of U.S. manufacturers, and probably spark a recession.Eaton may be walking a dangerous line by putting so much faith in the lower dollar. 
"We have decided that our original disposition was not an appropriate one," the court said.The influential court has been closely divided along partisan and ideological lines. 
"Ideological p.r." in Washington (as publicist Melinda Patrician put it) is being handled by Fenton Communications Inc., which arranged screenings for civil-rights groups and community leaders, squeezing Mr. Costa-Gavras in with its efforts as a registered foreign agent for the government of Angola. (The Danny Ortega and Maurice Bishop p.r. accounts have gone.)A press release intones: "There is a fine line between fact and fiction. 
You need trucks to go everywhere," Mr. McMillin said.While he was bullish on Sara Lee's strategy, Mr. McMillin said integrating food-service companies -- which typically are entrepreneurial businesses organized along regional lines -- often is a long and difficult process. 
Unless the case is settled out of court, it may yet establish a precedent that helps define the difference between business and pleasure.Says Stanley Chesley, the Cincinnati attorney representing Mrs. Goldstein: "It's a fine line distinction, and ultimately a jury will decide." 
That began a political fiasco that killed the industry's chances for a 1988 recovery.In what a congressional aide called "the North-South war," the soybean association split along regional lines. 
The committee also backed Reynolds research that found "a substantial reduction in the irritant properties" of tobacco smoke in the air.But the RJR Nabisco Inc. unit continues to walk a narrow line between publishing its research and promoting its product as a safer cigarette. 
The product is more expensive to make than conventional cigarettes -- and that requires a higher price tag, which also means going after a more affluent consumer.Beyond that, the company must walk a fine line in pitching the cigarette as "cleaner" without representing that it is healthier. 
Should it really be the top defense priority of a Philippine president to dicker over more dollars from American allies?Or is it perhaps more important to draw a clear line against the Soviet Union's increasing military presence in the Pacific? 
But for 11 years, President Zia forestalled political liberalizations.As a result, social and political pressures are starting to pull Pakistan apart, along ethnic lines. 
If statistics were collected, Manhattan Island would be terrified by an astronomical trade deficit.In another sense it is an artifact of economic fashion: a reflection of where economists currently choose to draw lines in a great circle of transactions: Once everything -- goods, services, bonds and so on -- is included, the accounts must balance; for every buyer there has to be a seller. 
Some smoking foes claim it's seeking "endorsements."In any event, Reynolds may be walking a fine line between getting out the facts and getting ensnared in regulatory problems. 
 "But we are willing to stand on our science in terms of what we have done to reduce various products of burning tobacco. Is that a narrow line?It's a very narrow but important line." 
In New Zealand there are two groups, Maori and pakeha, who believe they have legitimate claims to resources.Giving to one group means taking from the other, and the taking in this case is inevitably going to be along racial lines. 
In fact, the feeling often is like a boxing match, with first one contender and then the other striking a blow for his or her life style or point of view while the crowd applauds.In plays of this kind the playwright often walks a thin line between a television sitcom and real drama. 
Because of a paper shortage, Izvestia is usually just six pages and several of those are for official communiques.Mostly, though, it is a question of deciding where to draw the line. 
This year and the next may be the worst ever for the municipal market in terms of low volume of new issues, but the market should then be poised for a turnaround, said Paul Sinsar, Drexel's national institutional sales manager of municipal bonds.Drexel itself is attempting to increase its presence in the municipal market, recently reorganizing its public finance efforts by dividing the department along regional lines. 
"To the extent the Nomura investment represents a willingness to back contested transactions, it is a strategy different from ours," said Peter Rona, chief executive of IBJ Schroder Bank & Trust Co., a U.S. unit of Industrial Bank of Japan.Mr. Drapkin of the Revlon Group and some other U.S. merger experts contended that the transaction indicates that Japanese firms, led by Nomura, will push harder in pursuing U.S. acquisitions, stretching the line between what is a friendly and hostile bid. 
The study found, in addition, that two-thirds of all parents owing support were becoming delinquent within three years of the order.The situation, which crossed all income and class lines, contributed significantly to the impoverishment of women and children. 
"This will cause more hard feelings in {the Houston suburb of} River Oaks than stealing someone else's maid," jokes Rep. Charles Wilson (D., Texas)."Bentsen will draw the line in the dust like Travis at the Alamo." 
Mr. Weld outlined to the senators, in essence, the indictment he would have brought against Mr. Meese, had he been the independent counsel.Mr. Weld said he resigned because "I simply felt that, in trying to do favors for his friend, Mr. Meese was drawn in over his head, and over the line of what the law allows." 
TELEMARKETING makes rapid strides at U.S. corporations.Lines between telemarketing and traditional marketing are fast blurring, says a Conference Board report. 
Splitting along partisan lines, the Senate Judiciary Committee yesterday rejected the controversial nomination of Bernard Siegan to the Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit in San Francisco. 
Potential running mates were required to submit boxes of documentation and to complete a questionnaire so detailed that Sen. Glenn divided it among his advisers.The 50-question survey, which ran more than six pages single-spaced, itself served as a winnowing agent; Mr. Nunn drew the line at answering it, and House Majority Leader Thomas Foley's wife, who is also one of his closest advisers, found it onerous. 
There's an element of sycophancy in Mr. Mackay, but he never seems gratingly obsequious.The interesting thing about his approach is that it forces him to tread a thousand fine lines. 
But federal officials charge that some of the companies are going too far."When you're misleading the public, there's a line.Most of these groups go way over the line," says Philip Gambino, a spokesman for the Social Security Administration. 
"It's ludicrous and rather obsequious to pretend you are warm, close friends in a business environment," says Ms. Martin, the columnist."It obscures the line of rank and command." 
"There's a way of hugging, and there's a way of hugging.And that one was over the line. 
Yet, at times, Justice Scalia can be unpredictable.He has said the court should rethink its 1973 test in which local community standards are used to decide when pornography is protected by the First Amendment; the line is too hard to draw. 
Cementing a party structure that was established only with Western pressure as a channel for arms, and with it cementing fringe politics, "could make Afghanistan look like Lebanon," says Mohammad Naim Farahi, a tribal leader from Farah province.A better solution, say most Afghans, is a "Loya Jirga," or traditional Afghan congress made up of district representatives, chiefly along tribal or ethnic lines. 
Competition did, as advertised, save money, but it also made inside information far more valuable -- and threatening to the entire procurement system itself.Operation Ill Wind, the code name for the two-year investigation blowing like a typhoon through the Pentagon, is showing that some competitors are going over the line in vying for contracts, which now total more than $160 billion a year. 
But as the southeast economy has boomed in Thatcherite Britain, the blots are threatening the picturesque edges of the greenbelt.Though the government promises it won't step over the line, the Tories are increasingly refusing to sanctify places that lie just outside it. 
One copyright lawyer familiar with advertising issues said that if the fight gets to court, the dispute would hinge on whether Soap Opera is "really poking fun at Rolling Stone, or whether they're just using that campaign as a cheap, if you will, creative attempt to ride on their shirttails."There is a fine line between parody and copyright infringement. 
Yet to a large degree, Mr. Jackson has accomplished what he set out to do when he first announced his candidacy for the Democratic presidential nomination.He has succeeded in creating a movement across racial lines -- a movement of society's have-nots -- and giving that movement a driving focus for its political aspirations. 
So it soon will start a program to train nearly 50,000 compliance managers and employees by Dec. 31 in the right and wrong ways to use statistics.It's a fine line to walk. 
At Maryland's Coordinating Center, about 60% of the clients are single parents, often poor, young, inner-city women.Prematurity and disease reach across class lines to the best and the worst of mothers, but a poor mother is at least twice as likely to have a baby born with low birthweight -- the babies at much higher risk of problems such as mental retardation, chronic lung ailments, blindness and deafness. 
At Maryland's Coordinating Center, about 60% of the clients are single parents, often poor, young, inner-city women.Prematurity and disease reach across class lines to the best and the worst of mothers, but a poor mother is at least twice as likely to have a baby born with low birthweight -- the babies at much higher risk of problems such as mental retardation, chronic lung ailments, blindness and deafness. 
Indeed, if Mr. Wright were a member of the executive branch, even the trivia the Ethics Committee is willing to investigate might prove politically fatal.We can't get too concerned about drawing lines between public and private expenditure of an aide's time, but in 1983 former Assistant HUD Secretary E.S. Savas was driven out of Washington because one of his assistants without his knowledge had a government secretary spend 20 hours typing corrections in the manuscript for his scholarly book, "Privatizing the Public Sector." 
Libya's Col. Moammar Gadhafi was given the floor at the summit's close to deliver a long lecture on the history of liberation movements, likening the struggle of the Palestinians to the fight of the Algerians against the French.Among the moderates, Jordan's King Hussein in particular managed here to walk a fine line between demonstrating support for the Palestinians and appearing to wish to usurp the PLO's position as the legitimate spokesman for Palestinians. 
The scammers themselves are quick to move at the first hint of trouble, surfacing in a new place under a new name to fleece a new flock.And frequently good cases can't be made against them anyway, because the line between outright fraud and unethical but technically legal behavior is often indistinct. 
Many takeover lawyers cross the line between legal adviser and business strategist. 
"It is not easy to have a consensus," he said, "because it is technically a complex problem."The issue of reducing, maintaining or increasing the cartel's production ceiling has divided the ministers along the same lines as the production-definition issue, with a majority of eight clearly in favor of some action to prop up weak oil prices. 
Market research shows strong demand in the Hispanic community for what he called "cross-over shows," which are similar in content and format to the general shows but geared to the Hispanic audience."Music transcends cultural lines," he said. 
"To go beyond is very hard (but) if we don't do it now we're lost."The response is most powerful among black voters, where apartheid touches an emotional chord reaching across class lines. 
"To go beyond is very hard (but) if we don't do it now we're lost."The response is most powerful among black voters, where apartheid touches an emotional chord reaching across class lines. 
But SACC field workers still operate above ground, out in the open, where their efforts to monitor and alleviate the repressive conditions in the country's black townships bring them into constant conflict with the authorities.Mr. Kgori and other field workers walk the fine line between social work, which is grudgingly tolerated by the government, and activism, which isn't. 
Mr. Walker and some other conservatives believe that confrontation has its place."We think there is some merit in drawing the line in the sand and saying we want to draw the distinction between conservatives and liberals," Rep.. Walker says. 
Wall Street sources say Odyssey holds just under 5% of Amfac, though it hasn't bought shares since late 1986.Odyssey is among the investment firms newly blurring the line between management-endorsed leveraged buy-outs and hostile takeover transactions. 
"I guess I would argue that there's some information that shouldn't be getable," Mr. Lambert says."Everyone would draw the line somewhat differently.Obviously, we draw the line that video rental is one area where people should have protection." 
So, it reinstated the 1986 decision, which was written by Chief Judge Patricia Wald.As has been the case on some other recent occasions, the appeals court was split along ideological lines, with five judges appointed by Democratic presidents voting to approve the watchdog group's standing and five appointed by President Reagan opposed. 
Since one reason for creating a diffusely held corporation in the first place is to separate governance from investment, this measure would raise transaction costs somewhat.But the line must be drawn somewhere regarding shareholders' participation in company decisions. 
Had these students been given a basic grounding in principles of business ethics, they would have learned that this "going along to get along" mentality is exactly what has gotten so many companies into trouble.In the area of gathering competitors' information -- where there is a fine line between aggressive market research and corporate espionage -- few business decisions are without ethical ramifications. 
Now everybody and his brother wants out.Now we can get away from the blurry line between pure entertainment and disguised toy commercial." 
Mr. Dukakis also is being viewed more favorably by black voters, whose enthusiastic support he will need in November.In New York, where Mayor Ed Koch's strident attacks on Mr. Jackson helped create a campaign sharply polarized along racial lines, black voters viewed Mr. Dukakis unfavorably by a margin of 33% to 27%. 
But a former Chun government official said there was "nothing approaching a power struggle after the inauguration of the new president."Others say Mr. Roh has been walking a fine line in the post-Chun period between his own political interests and loyalty to the old friend and fellow general whom he helped bring to power in 1979. 
Yet it isn't easy to serve both giant aerospace concerns and one-man machine shops.Milacron also must walk a narrow line, supplying the machines that manufacturers want today without backing away from advanced technology. 
Norman M. Coulson, president of Glenfed Inc., the Glendale, Calif.-based parent of the nation's fifth-largest thrift, noted that his institution has good will on its books stemming from acquisitions of troubled thrifts that were made in the early 1980s to help the FSLIC."I'm concerned about how they draw the line," he said. 
Earlier this month, a major investment banking firm, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., took an equity position in a group seeking control of Koppers Co., a Pittsburgh construction materials concern.The move marked the first time in memory a takeover adviser crossed the line to act as a hostile suitor. 
"The trend is to respect individual privacy a lot more and tolerate unorthodox life styles," says Terry L. Leap, a management professor at Clemson University who has studied off-duty firings.He adds that the growing use of drug testing -- and subsequent firings -- has heightened the issue because it's "drawing the line between public and private conduct." 
Like Ms. Luckyn-Malone, whose research is supplemented by a Nikko Securities Co. affiliate in Tokyo, Mr. Wignall insists that GT ultimately rests its investment decisions on fundamentals.For Dimensional Fund Advisors, the solution to Tokyo's inscrutability is elegantly simple: With help from Nomura Securities Co., DFA ranks companies in the Tokyo Stock Exchange's first section by market capitalization, draws a line between big and small stocks, and buys all the small ones -- around 550 of them. 
That, he says, is worrisome: "If the ethics of the corporation become the ethics of the universities, then we're really in trouble."Even now, university business programs "walk a lot thinner line regarding ethics than they used to," says Charles Hickman, director of projects and member services for the American Assembly of Collegiate Schools of Business. 
In the IBM culture, that's like Russia's Politburo begging reporters to write about a hot young party member.IBM draws the line on too much technical detail, however. 
NBC and Disney would likely share profits from reruns, which may be syndicated by Disney's Buena Vista sibling, if their comedy series ultimately is sold to local stations.As the lines between cable TV and the rest of the business blur, cable is mimicking some of regular TV's most timeworn techniques, such as the spinoff. 
"What British attorney would defend a Nazi in the second world war?" he asks. "In Israel, we are at war, and if you defend terrorists you cross the line into the enemy camp."Ms. Tsemel crossed that line just after the 1967 war. 
None of the leading Democrats has the nerve -- so far -- to demand from him a more complete accounting."In moderation," Kevin Phillips, the GOP theoretician, said earlier this week, "some of that might actually help the Democrats, but drawing the line is going to be very tricky." 
A member of the Japanese negotiating team confirmed that Tokyo wants the talks to continue, and said it has offered "sincere and substantive proposals" and that "some progress has been made."The Japanese acknowledged, though, that they had failed to reach agreement with the U.S. on several issues, including how to draw a line between the public and private sectors in the projects discussed. 
The structure of the partnership also allowed the group to bypass federal antitrust regulations that would have prohibited the members from easily accumulating a large position in Koppers stock; yesterday, the group disclosed that it held a 7.45% stake in the company.By joining the hostile bid, Shearson stepped over the line investment banks have long considered but rarely, if ever, crossed. 
It also yielded 10 to 12 basis points less than a comparable Ford Motor Credit offering in the U.S., according to syndication specialists.However, the lackluster reception of General Electric Capital Corp.'s mid-February $250 million issue may demonstrate that even a top-rated borrower can overstep the line between inexpensive financing and an overly aggressive deal, syndication specialists argue. 
We hear it as a rumor," says the investor."Where do you draw the line between a rumor and inside information?" 
He adds that only about 50% of the financial planners affiliated with the company work on commission anyway; the others work for a fee.The series brings up yet again the controversy over paid programming, which can blur the line between news and advertising. 
Mr. Timmeny, now in private practice in Washington, is frequently hired by corporate boards in such situations.That "bright line," he says, is a company's formal concensus to go after an acquisition. 
But Waste Management's executives, he says, never crossed it.Others say the line isn't quite so clear. 
Allegis Corp.'s plan to make a $2.84 billion tender offer for 63% of its shares appeared to straddle the line in a tug-of-war between shareholders and the company's management. 
"Dan Rather was out of control," said Christine Dolan, who directs Cable News Network's political coverage."He had the right to press the vice president, but he crossed the line with his badgering." 
Ranchers play classical music to their cattle in the barns, while out in the fields, workers and their families live on diets of leftover silage."The line between moral and immoral has vanished," says Fernando Collor de Mello, the governor.The drive to redraw that line started here several years ago, when a state assemblyman named Antonio Saturnino de Mendonca Neto raised charges that the government was full of money-grabbing loafers. 
All major dealers are "certainly less aggressive" in positioning large blocks of bonds, says Robert Dennis, president of Massachusetts Financial Service's MFS Managed Municipal Bond Trust.The brokerage firms are walking a "fine line between serving their customers and managing their own risk," he says. 
For example, the question of "how much is too much" of a specific toxic chemical is one that has bedeviled regulatory agencies since the beginning of modern toxics law.Even after a chemical is absolutely confirmed to cause cancer, based on laboratory or workplace doses, there is extensive debate over the danger of smaller doses, and where or whether to draw a line between amounts worth worrying about and amounts that can more or less be safely ignored. 
Even after a chemical is absolutely confirmed to cause cancer, based on laboratory or workplace doses, there is extensive debate over the danger of smaller doses, and where or whether to draw a line between amounts worth worrying about and amounts that can more or less be safely ignored.Under the typical toxics control law, government scientists and regulators have the job of deciding where to draw the line for each chemical; and until the line is drawn, in effect, the law is not in force. 
This has long been a society divided between the "haves" and the "will haves," to steal a phrase.When the day arrives that class lines grow rigid, when we are a nation of permanent haves and have-nots, we will have become something other than America. 
He proposed developing "the idea of a 'reference zone' that can be sustained for at least 18 months."Others echoed this thought, though at least one wondered -- as I do -- whether there is any defensible line between the floating rates that have proved so unstable and fixed rates intended to take precedence over domestic economic policy. 
What this indicates is that when order growth accelerates . . . each incremental revenue dollar will generate a lot of profit," Mr. Schulman added.Since the stock market crash, Digital has been trying to walk a fine line between expanding market share -- by increasing sales and marketing spending -- and controlling costs. 
Should -- and can -- the schools, many of which are already overburdened, take on the added reponsibility?How sharply should the line be drawn between the schools' educational and care functions? 
When pressed, Heinz Eiermann, head of colors and cosmetics for the FDA, concedes that the people who buy these things probably "like to be fooled."But he says "there's a line -- it may be a fuzzy line -- where you have to say, enough is enough." 
"In the words of Gypsy Rose Lee," Ms. Hoyt said, "you gotta have a gimmick."This gimmick, many PR consultants concur, crossed the line. 
Even now, university business programs "walk a lot thinner line regarding ethics than they used to," says Charles Hickman, director of projects and member services for the American Assembly of Collegiate Schools of Business.But in the case at West Virginia University's College of Business and Economics, the students not only walked the line. 
However, you're missing the point.The constant dancing on the border of what is criminal and what is not and the consistent crossing of the line of what is ethical by the attorney general of the United States -- the highest legal officer in the land -- make a mockery of our sense of justice. 
"But most public companies fail to see the difference between a (short-term) bridge loan and an equity investment, anyway.Shearson stepped over the line, but it shouldn't hurt them. 
The races mingle in department stores and at downtown restaurants, where city employees all eat between noon and one.But beneath the cordiality is a schism, largely along racial lines. 
Once this happens, everything from a phone call to a breakfast meeting in the corporate dining room amounts to corporate activity on behalf of a candidate -- something forbidden by the campaign laws.It's too soon to say with certainty where the line is or how much one has to do to cross it. 
BROADWAY'S NEW hit, "The Phantom of the Opera," takes place in the dim recesses of a 19th century Paris opera house.The dark, ominous set deliberately blurs the line between audience and stage; for instance, the proscenium has been moved forward to embrace several rows of balcony seats.But the line between inside and outside the theater has also been blurred. 
But the law doesn't spell out clearly what those "steps" could be, allowing for sharply different opinions on the matter."You look for the bright line beyond which you should not trade," says Wallace Timmeny, a former deputy director of the Securities and Exchange Commission's enforcement division who was hired by Waste Management's special committee to lead the investigation of the insider trading allegations. 
Mr. Timmeny, now in private practice in Washington, is frequently hired by corporate boards in such situations. That "bright line," he says, is a company's formal concensus to go after an acquisition.Mr. Timmeny says that individual traders within a company may reach that line before the company itself. 
And No. 2, (if they do) it should be revealed that that is the arrangement," he says."That's a fine line across which one shouldn't pass." 
The obvious reply is that "Tour of Duty" is much more than a macho shoot-'em-up.Within the constraints of prime time, it offers powerful yet clear-eyed dramatizations of such diverse topics as racial conflict, substance abuse, the insensitivity of journalists, the arrogance of anti-war protesters, the poignancy of reunions with loved ones, the power of letters from home, trust and mistrust toward the South Vietnamese, the line between useful bravery and useless heroics, the ambitions of officers, the deceptions of the enemy. 
While we believe that we should have only the government we need, our responsibility to the most vulnerable members of our society requires that we also have all the government we need.Where the line gets drawn is always a matter of judgment. 
We should consider setting up special camps in our more underpopulated states such as Wyoming or Montana, where noncontributing segments of the population can perform useful work . . ."Another letter sniffs: "As viewed from the other, presumably greener, side of the line, I can assure you it is impossible to obtain the services of a competent housekeeper. 
They sit around hoping someone will suddenly say, 'Let's call it Jell-O.'"Brainstormers are always walking the fine line of faux pas. 
Madison responded that the distinction was "altogether fanciful.If a line can be drawn between the powers granted and the rights retained, it would seem to be the same thing, whether the latter be secured, by declaring that they shall not be abridged, or that the former shall not be extended." 
The high court let stand the Federal Reserve Board's approval for a bank holding company, a subsidiary of National Westminster Bank PLC, Britain's largest commercial bank, to operate a brokerage subsidiary that trades securities and offers investment advice.The Fed's approval was another in a series of regulatory steps that have blurred the line between the banking and securities industries. 
We're inclined to think that the vice president deserves some defending on this point.He alone seems willing to say that a line has to be drawn somewhere in front of the dead-end politics of the Iran-Contra affair. 
Many are concerned that reducing the overhang quickly will wreck already shaken markets, but there is pressure on the regulators from Congress and developers to sell as much as they can as soon as they can, and the pace seems to be quickening."You walk a very fine line between fulfilling your mandate of winding up the affairs of the institution, and not creating disruptions in the marketplace," says Thomas Procopio, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp.'s Southern regional director for receivership activities. 
It was all too mellow to be believed, but they probably would have gotten away with it, had they not felt compelled to add Ms. Collins's signature tune, "Amazing Grace," and ask for audience participation.That went over the permissible line for warm and fuzzy feelings. 
"I'd be destroying myself," replies Mr. Korotich, who then asks, "What would that accomplish?"His answer reveals his vulnerability -- it also draws the line that Soviet society must cross to enter the normal dialogue of Western culture.It is the line beyond which the press can report not only on the bankruptcy of factories but on the failures of even admirable leaders. 
"People see extra messages in advertising, and if a manufacturer is clearly trying to get something out of it . . . if it's too transparent . . . then consumers will see through that," warns John Philip Jones, chairman of the advertising department at the Newhouse School of Public Communications at Syracuse University."It can backfire because companies can step across the line and go too far, be too pushy," agrees Gary Stibel, a principal with New England Consulting Group, Westport, Conn. 
The FCC now says 8 p.m. is the time that is all right to begin airing indecent material because children aren't likely listening in great numbers. Earlier, the agency set the decency line at midnight, but an appeals court rejected that time as too restrictive."You have to draw some lines," said Robert Pettit, the FCC's general counsel. 
Consultants have said that it will take a while for all the pieces of the IBM strategy to fall into place, even though the specific products IBM unveiled will generally be available by the end of the first quarter.Sam Albert, a consultant in Scarsdale, N.Y., said that in the past IBM has developed broad software strategies only for problems that crossed industry lines. 
Moreover, ticket splitting appears to take the same peculiar pattern at the state government level as it does at the federal level.State government is more typically split along Republican-governor/Democratic-legislature lines than the reverse. 
It has been rightly observed that the main thing wrong with tainted money is, t'aint enough of it.A handful of the New Crowd operators have crossed the line from the immoral to the illegal, and have ended up in the slammer or paying huge fines: Ivan Boesky, Dennis Levine, Martin Siegel, Victor and Steven Posner, and now Michael Milken and perhaps Leona Helmsley. 
Although Wang will report a loss for the first quarter ended Sept. 30 and the full fiscal year, Mr. Miller says he expects the company will return to profitability by the fourth quarter.Experts on sales technique say anyone representing a troubled company must walk a fine line. 
That's the conventional theory anyway.In practice, however, the line between interpretation and redefinition of the criminal law long ago began to blur. 
Or did Mr. Chestman only hear a market rumor (which one may lawfully trade upon)?The line seems awfully thin for criminal-law purposes. 
Although the average citizen is probably not harmed too much from Washington's rhetorical war against Wall Street regarding excessive financial leveraging, actual legislation would probably impose considerable harm.Any such attempt to distinguish "good debt" from "bad debt," or to draw the line at a particular industry, such as the airlines, is likely to blunt the spur that the proper amount of leverage provides both to equity markets and economic efficiency in general. 
"In most cases, the client is more inclined to be conservative because they want to protect a franchise that can take only so much fiddling," says Mr. Lindsay."You're treading a fine line." 
Indeed, research is the one clear comparative advantage that educational institutions have over other competitors in the field of human-resources development.The line between education and training is often a fine one, and European business schools should continue to ensure that the value they can provide is different from that of consulting firms and in-house corporate training programs. 
News shows used to be sacrosanct -- you showed real footage or you didn't show anything.Today, those lines are blurred. 
Bush antitrust officials may not attack a substantially greater number of mergers than the Reagan administration, but their choice of cases will signal an intent to apply a tighter mesh.The Antitrust Division's treatment of Coors's proposed acquisition of Stroh Brewing will indicate where Mr. Rill plans to draw the line. 
"We've all done business with them -- sold them cars or houses," says a Cali banker and polo club member who sometimes has difficulty reaching his office floor because the narcos, who also have offices in his building, have bribed the elevator operators with soccer tickets to stop only at their floors."It's very difficult to draw the line." 
What shocks at first becomes routine the fourth time, and "normal" the 14th.The line in mainstream films was crossed in 1976 in "Silver Streak," a successful comedy with gratuitous violence spicing up the slapstick. 
Already there have been passionate exhanges over the issue of Syria.But the debate hasn't followed strictly sectarian lines. 
-- Mr. Breeden said the regulation system could be strengthened by improving coordination among regulators.The SEC and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission "should try to develop mutually acceptable proposals to define product and jurisdictional lines," he said, and the lack of clarity in determining jurisdiction "does adversely affect U.S. competitiveness." 
"Bush has frustrated them, in part by doing so little, in part by preserving his popularity.He's been a difficult target and they're so eager for a partisan confrontation to draw the line with him that they've seized on this." 
He succeeds Richard T. Gerstner, who has a chronic back problem that has kept him from working full-time and who will move into an unspecified, special assignment.Mr. Cannavino, 45 years old, will bring more technical knowledge to the job than Mr. Gerstner possessed -- at a time when the line between personal computers and workstations is blurring, creating a confusing array of technical choices. 
But some banks have participated in leveraged buy-outs under waivers allowing them to buy nearly 50% of small businesses.In the current climate in which several leveraged companies have run into trouble, unsettling the entire junk-bond market, the Fed apparently drew the line at allowing the Del Monte unit to qualify as a small business. 
Among his choices are Coca-Cola, Merck, Procter & Gamble and Philip Morris.There is a fine line between an economy that crawls and one that falls.Mickey Levy, chief economist at First Fidelity Bancorp. in Philadelphia, says he thinks the economy is walking that line. 
Thus, companies say they're forced into a balancing act.Says Mr. Brainard of Refined Sugars, "You're really walking a fine line between being able to attract good people and being able to run a profitable business without giving away the store." 
In scenes like the one in which Shirer cooperates with a U.S. Naval Intelligence officer's request to do a little spying on the side, the film illustrates very clearly that the survival of press freedom depends on that of legitimately constituted government.When confronted with a world-class liar like Goebbels, or (more recently) with the kind of people who thought nothing of whitewashing the blood from Tiananmen Square, it's heartening to know that a line still exists between journalistic pride and journalistic hubris. 
Under the Senate bill, for example, a company could be required to offer any benefits to 90% of employees and pay at least 60% of the costs.A Senate aide familiar with Section 89 says Rep. Rostenkowski "has moved the line with this new proposal, but he hasn't abandoned the principle. 
"There's a lot to be said for it," says William Poole, a Brown University economist and former presidential economic adviser."It would promote clear lines of responsibility." 
The $60 million Sears just pocketed from the State of Illinois in exchange for retaining its headquarters in the state may well represent a competitive brake on the avarice of the state government.But there is a fine line separating tax rate reductions from the public dole. 
"I believe in letting companies have a reasonable return.But where does one draw the line and say you've made enough profit, and now it's unseemly?" asks Peter Jensen, chief of infectious diseases of the San Francisco VA Hospital. 
Some people even blame IRS inaction for encouraging the epidemic of build-nothing bonds.The more aggressive securities firms "put a foot over the chalk line and looked around, and nobody said anything," says Austin Koenen, vice chairman of the Public Securities Association, "so everyone else moved over the line." 
The language would extend this prohibition to the 20% of domestic flights that aren't currently covered by the no-smoking rule.The same long-distance traffic accounts for a larger share -- more than a third -- of total airline passengers, and tobacco allies had hoped to draw the line at two hours. 
The 37-year-old Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, who was born in Havana, defeated Mr. Richman, 48, a Miami lawyer, by 53% to 47% in a bitterly fought race that pitted Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen's Little Havana constituency against Mr. Richman's Jewish constituency centered in Miami Beach.Both candidates were criticized for urging voters to cast their ballots along ethnic lines. 
Of Workaholic BehaviorWITH MANY managers routinely putting in 60 hour work weeks, it may seem hard for them to know when they've crossed the line from simply working hard to the unhealthy obsession of workaholism. 
Voters condemn the press for printing all this information at the same time they read every word of it voraciously."Drawing the line is tricky business, but when it comes to heterosexual politicians, at least there are a few basics. 
"This is unquestionably an indirect shot at General Mills," says John McMillin, food analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., noting the questions raised about the study cited in General Mills' advertising for Benefit.As for how one can distinguish between a "claim" and a "message," he says, "it's a very fine line." 
Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, who got 53% of the vote, is the first Cuban-American elected to Congress.Both candidates in the bitterly fought race were criticized for urging voters to cast ballots along ethnic lines. 
Mr. Helmsley, 80 years old, was named in the indictment but Judge John Walker Jr. ruled he wasn't well enough to stand trial.Tax lawyers say the case involves areas where it is hard to draw the line between criminal activity and deficient tax practices. 
"We've got a lot of clients that will never do this," Stephen L. Nesbitt, Wilshire's head of pension consulting, says of junk investing."For a lot of foundations and public funds, this crosses the line of political acceptability." 
---Your writers remind us the problem cuts across all socioeconomic lines, affects all age groups, and results in staggering human and financial losses. 
Adds John P. Schaefer, an outside board member who now is chairman, no one wanted to infringe on Mr. Greve's authority and discretion."There is a fine line," he says, "between oversight and interfering in management." 
Moscow appears willing to permit non-Communists to attempt to revive Warsaw's faltering economy so long as the Soviet Union's security interests are protected.Mr. Walesa understands that there are lines drawn by the Soviets that his movement can't cross. 
For House and Senate appropriators, changing priorities means adapting old methods to new ends.Traditional lines of jurisdiction blur as foreign-aid, space and military accounts are tapped for environmental projects. 
By slightly modifying its technical standards, the new order adds the IBM PS/2 Model 50 and its clones to the list of desktops to be taken off the control list.The earlier decision drew the line at the PS/2 Model 30 and their equivalents. 
Now Congress, it seems, is closing the windows, pulling the shades, and barring the door, lest the public see the light.Sometime, somewhere, the president needs to draw the line. 
Drawing deeply on a Lucky Strike, he says: "We never had a problems with the NEA until an acknowledged homosexual who died of AIDS -- and I'm sorry he did -- came along with a series of photographs designed to promote homosexuality.There I draw the line."It is a line that many Beltway Cassandras say may divide lawmakers in "the smut and obscenity vote of the year," a line running through an exceptionally tricky political quagmire, in which the basic aesthetic issues tend to sink below the surface. 
Over the decades, the Supreme Court has determined that so-called commercial speech -- which it defines as speech leading to a commercial transaction -- has less protection than does the rest of speech.So if you say "Buy Finnegan's Ice Cream," that has less protection than if you say "Ice cream is good for you." (If you say "Finnegan's Ice Cream Is Good for You," it's debatable whether you're leading up to a commercial transaction, which is one problem with drawing lines when lines shouldn't be drawn.) 
The lawsuit says Mr. Campbell informed Mr. Meier of inquiries made by the SEC and the compliance departments of Merrill Lynch and Smith Barney.Lawyers who have followed such cases say there is a fine line between illegal insider trading and piggy-backing that doesn't violate the law. 
Family dissolution, moreover, is often the consequence rather than the cause of the economic reshuffling we are seeing in America.While it is true that complex cultural changes have created a steady rise in divorce and illegitimacy during most of the 20th century (the U.S. has had the highest divorce rate in the world since 1899), people with the lowest educational attainment and greatest vulnerability to poverty have historically had the highest rates of divorce, illegitimacy and child neglect. (Sexual abuse is much more evenly distributed across class lines.) These are the people who have been the big losers since the late 1960s. 
Even people who did not accept that logic would have regarded it as involving an unnecessary and undesirable deflection of tax and expenditure programs from their long-run course.There was a policy consensus in favor of Option B in a mild recession and Option C in a severe one, with the main argument about how to draw the line between mild and severe. 
"There is no doubt that there is some type of conduct involving the deliberate release of false information that may not just be libelous but may also be fraudulent," agrees Mr. Abrams, the libel attorney.But because so few suits are filed over competitive tactics -- and almost none ever decided in court -- the hazy line between what's fair and what's illegal can be hard to pin down. 
But because so few suits are filed over competitive tactics -- and almost none ever decided in court -- the hazy line between what's fair and what's illegal can be hard to pin down."The line is not easy to define," says Mr. Hanson. 
"But it comes when an organization becomes more concerned with destroying a competing business than in demonstrating that its own goods and services are superior."He adds, "When the sole purpose of a marketing strategy is the defeat of a certain company, then the company has gone across a line that probably will lead into questionable behavior." 
The clear suggestion was that they had decided to throw the support of their powerful LDP factions behind Mr. Kaifu.Tsutomu Hata, a Takeshita-faction Diet member and former agriculture minister, said in a television interview that Mr. Kaifu is "the type of person who crosses factional lines," meaning that he could be supported by members of other factions. 
Advertising agencies are used to difficult clients, but sometimes you have to draw the line. 
The U.S. groups feared a return to the violence of the early 1980s by death squads that have been linked to some Arena party leaders."We believe the line has to be drawn very clearly on El Salvador," says Mr. Byrne of Cispes. 
I think it's fair to say that I would like to have the luxury of being able to make a cut as to some types of persons that I would defend, and others that I would prefer not to.There are people or institutions that are legitimate, that have a real business, and who step over the line, and have to be held accountable for it. 
 There was thus a limit to Wilson's patience . He publicly set it at the line where admitted neutral rights were infringed after protracted warning , and he made it a point of national self-respect and honor to defend those rights .
 The vital judicial issue is apt , therefore , to be their accommodation . Decisions thus become essentially a matter of drawing lines .
 Usually we come out that I can tell the company everything that I think will matter in the least bit to what he's going to be like on the job from nine to five . If I thought he was going to be cruising at the water cooler at ten-thirty in the morning , I might have to draw the line .
 He was going to be put into confinement , perhaps for months ; he would be almost entirely deprived of direct contact with other human beings ; he would live in a sterilized , purified world . And then deliberately with further drug and radiation treatment he was going to be driven down to the fine line which separates life from death .
 What did it mean ? Where was the line between intimacy and privacy ?
 She was surprised when Shirley told her that the Higginses , Shirley's first parents-in-law , had spoken of her as a socialist . All she had ever done was draw the line between possible and inconceivable behavior , which were her personal substitutes for right and wrong .
 Presently , when James gave a farewell party because his sisters and brothers-in-law were leaving Paris , he casually invited the Maurels and the Ziffs . Here they drew the line : enough was enough .
 I can't see any basic difference between selling your body for sex and selling it for baseball or football ; or for that matter , selling the ability to write or draw . With sex , the line between giving a dinner or a trinket and giving cash seems particularly thin .
 By ignoring the democratic means that is perhaps the most basic tenet of liberalism , these new liberals in fact abandoned their earlier faith . Not surprisingly , conservatives welcomed this change of heart , as well as the program of social order and economic development , thus blurring the lines between the two historic rivals .
 This attitude is at the root of most of the cheating that has become so prevalent lately , above all among successful students in " good " schools . The line is not easy to draw between reading a teacher's mind , or making him think you know what you don't know , and outright cheating .
 Studying the human condition , a writer uses such enlightenment as comes to hand . And as for the sexes , artists in every field have been able to cross that line ; it is common knowledge that witches can change their sex at will .
 In 1916 , Harvard research physiologists regarded the engineering sciences somewhat as philosophers of the sixteenth century looked on barber-surgeons useful creatures but hardly to be included in the guild of scholars . When Cecil proposed the appointment of his brother Philip , he stepped across traditional academic lines .
 Its labor directors and faculty members were progressives or radicals . No political lines were drawn in admitting students so that typically the student body included conservative trade unionists as well as Communist party members .
 On the other hand , we should seek to minimize , if not entirely eliminate , our military presence in the less developed countries of Asia , and we should minimize alliances that commit us irrevocably to their defense , particularly in unilateral action , or run the risk of embroiling us in their civil wars . It will not always be easy to draw the line between undesirable military roles and useful ones .
 Forward supplies can largely be stored in these same areas , and land forces are best held in reserve on our own soil . Drawing a line between military aid and military involvement may be harder , but it can be done if we keep the distinction clearly in mind .
 To Lincoln's charge that popular sovereignty was incompatible with the Dred Scott decision , Douglas replied that citizens of a territory could bypass the decision simply by failing to pass laws to protect slavery , since slavery obviously could not exist anywhere without laws to protect it . The reply was sufficient to let Douglas gain re-election to the Senate in Illinois , but it split the Democratic party into slavery and popular-sovereignty factions which divided along sectional lines .
 The fact is , however , that while the regime has fluctuated between permissiveness and crackdowns , nothing fundamental has changed . The supposed new freedoms and reforms all stop safely before the line where they might impinge on the power monopoly .
 The objective was to make a killing , and nothing less would do . The climbing curve of the Dow-Jones averages was literally a fever chart of a speculative virus which crossed all social and economic lines .
 Misprision is one thing ; cocksure , quick-on-the-trigger judgments are another . It is a narrow line we walk , always , between help and hindrance .
 The relationship between the two is dialectical ; it is impossible to determine in the abstract at what exact point a gang of common criminals becomes a revolutionary army . In practice , Prime Minister Trudeau concluded that with the kidnaping of the British diplomat , James Cross , and Pierre Laporte , the Quebec Liberation Front ( FLQ ) had crossed the line .
 It is no wonder that many of the old sourdoughs made it a practice to break up partnerships before the winter set in , living like hermits until spring mellowed the atmosphere and made companionship desirable again . For those who normally tread at the very edge of mental disorder , the advent of the long darkness is the catalytic agent that pushes them over the line into the realm of insanity .
 She turned to confront him , a spark of anger in her eyes . " That goes beyond the line of pleasing , sir !
 Adams was prone to absent himself from capital and cabinet when Congress was not in session , tempting his subordinates to seek other counsel . But Hamilton overstepped the line of propriety , indeed of candor .
 As far as I'm concerned , if anyone expects me to accept his rules on sex , he must prove that he doesn't have dusty cobwebs inside his skull or in his crotch . Having said all that , I can almost hear your next question : Is there any place where daddy does draw the line ?
 At a height of 6 feet , 4 inches and weight of 220 pounds , Greg Cook is cut from the mold that Roman Gabriel has made fashionable for quarterback stars . Much more handsome than Namath , with blond hair swirling mod-style about his face , Greg says , " There's a hairline difference between confidence and overconfidence and I'm sitting right on that line . "
 In fact , the religions of many simple peoples are more involved than our own . Where we draw the line between superstition and religion , primitive man does not .
 And he favored husbands accompanying their wives to the hospital , donning a white smock , and lending their emotional support during labor . But after that he drew the line .
 " While Canterbury stood silent , a Kent State functionary stared at Lunine and said , " Those students shouldn't be on that hill . There has to be a line drawn somewhere .
 On some regionals , in fact , specialists have strong ties to the third market because they are free , as Big Board specialists are not , to shop with third-market firms when trying to buy or sell blocks . The lines between the third market and the other markets are blurring in other ways .
 Right now you may be in love with Rachael and trying to know the limits of that love . Apparently the line is drawn short of marriage .
 For what one practitioner has termed " therapy virgins , " however members with no previous experience of group therapy the marathon is not without its dangers . Ordinary neurotics well within the borders of any definition of sanity often undergo in their daily lives states that verge on the psychotic ; a marathon may push these persons over the line into an actual psychosis .
 Here was age inconceivable but not death , for the Moon had never lived until now . The descending ship was poised almost above the line dividing night from day , and directly below was a chaos of jagged shadows and brilliant , isolated peaks catching the first light of the slow lunar dawn .
 From Canada comes an example of this genre , Zero the Fool , a movie shot , edited and directed by Morley Markson and in this case , the names and major events don't seem to have been tampered with even slightly . Kay Armatage , a critic for Montreal's avant-garde bimonthly Take One , reviews this final assault on the thin line separating " cinema life " from " real life . "
 Okay . Most of us have to function somewhere below the genius line .
 It's sheer presumption to suppose that the organic orientation of matter is any more lively than the inorganic , it's sheer human vanity to imagine the soul is any more immutable than a piece of rock , a pebble in a penguin's nest . Draw for me , the ice said , the line between life and not-life .
 I merely lacked the hammer of thigh and hip muscles which normally drive the nail home . The line between me and the youth frolicking in the sea with my girl was a thin one , but I couldn't step over it .
 And then , in a quiet voice , almost as though she were talking to herself , as though she had forgotten the existence of the others , Annette said : " Where will it end ? Where will the line be drawn ?
 How is it going to be closed again ? Who's going to draw the line ?
 A somewhat smaller percentage of married couples complain that their mothers-in-law are too indifferent and disinterested in them . These represent the two sides of a very narrow line that a mother must walk as soon as her child marries .
 In France the best athletes have jobs at which they do little or no work , in order to permit them to concentrate on training . Even Australia , one of the few nations that still hold a firm line between amateurism and professionalism , sends its team to camp for an extended pre-Olympic period .
 The front had been brought much closer to shore ; it now lay only two hours from port , where sky and water met in the west . That was the thin line between war and peace .
 " Young lady , I'm afraid some of your ideas need rethinking before you carry them out into the world . " It was a pleasantly tough smile on a face itself pleasantly tough , despite the blurring of line that overweight and the passing years had brought , and Shirley's answering smile lit up the corners of her personality .
 When the service is over , the families sit down to a robust meal and a good long chat , for conversation remains an essential part of life in the absence of such pale substitutes as television . Generally , however , work and religion are the twin themes because the Amish draw no line between work and religion and life .
 I was , in part , terribly discouraged , but at the same time excited by the narrow escape from victory . The line between the Russian cellist's cooperation and rejection seemed so thin .
 In general , childhood phobias are less serious than phobias which develop later in life . It is difficult to draw a fine line between universal fears and common phobias .
 One of the toughest Department troubleshooters . His presence reflected the sensitive line between Air Force and State .
 No. She could not prove that Mrs. Willymore had secret intentions , or that her words were false . The line between recovering and has recovered was fine .
 Equality , on its positive side , reflects the desire of individuals to emulate the good life as exemplified by others , to catch up , to improve , to excel , to realize more fully their potential , to develop and express themselves , to contribute , to count ( and be counted ) as responsible actors in their time . But across a thin line lies the other aspect of the drive for equality .
 One of the most important paintings from this find , Front Face , a portrait of a Negro child in a soldier suit , realized $67,000 at Parke-Bernet in 1970 . Sometimes the line between expertise and plain dumb luck is very thin .
 From here on , either he would sit on his own front porch watching his cattle feed on his hillside , or he would return to San Soucie and give himself up . Was the line between heaven and hell really so thin ?
 The definition of alcoholism is vague , and the diagnosis is difficult . It's not always easy to know where to draw the line between a strong dependency on alcohol and out-and-out alcoholism .
 Senators are constantly asked to choose between particular regional needs and nationwide goals , and the good ones learn to balance their loyalites . They walk a fine line in doing it . The career diplomats in Kabul also had a fine line to walk .
